South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3173.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 25, Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-3255. (A) The driver of a vehicle approaching: (1) a sidewalk; (2) a crosswalk; or (3) entering an intersection that fails to yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian and all other traffic, and causes great bodily injury or death to a person, must be punished pursuant to the provisions contained in Section 56-5-6190. (B) The term "great bodily injury," as used in this section, means bodily injury which creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious, permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of a bodily member or organ. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----